Nevada, session 83, SB459.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 463.4073 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
463.4073 The Commission shall, with the advice and
assistance of the Board, adopt regulations setting forth:
1. The policies and procedures for approval of a license to
operate a gaming salon.
2. The standards of operation for a gaming salon, including,
without limitation, policies and procedures governing:
(a) Surveillance and security systems.
(b) The games offered. The regulations must provide that the
games offered [must] may include table games , [and may include]
slot machines [.] or any other gambling games, or any combination
thereof.
(c) Minimum wagers for any game offered. The regulations
must provide that minimum wagers for slot machines must [not be
less than $500.] be established by the licensee and approved by the
Board.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)